sk-SK: Formát aplikátora: Aplikátor s popruhom na chrbát; Fľaštička s guľôčkou; Štetec; Obojstranná rukavica; Rukavica; Rukavica; Pumpový dávkovač; Roll-on fľaštička; Špachtľa; Špongia; Fľaša s rozprašovačom; Iné
ru: Формат аппликатора: Аппликатор с ремнем для спины; Флакон с роликом; Кисть; Двусторонняя рукавица; Перчатка; Рукавица; Дозатор с помпой; Роликовый флакон; Лопатка; Губка; Бутылка с распылителем; Другой
nl: Applicatorformaat: Rugband-applicator; Fles met rollerbal; Borstel; Dubbelzijdige handschoen; Handschoen; Handschoen; Pompje; Roll-on fles; Spatel; Spons; Spuitfles; Andere
zh-CN: 涂抹器形式: 背带涂抹器; 滚珠瓶; 刷子; 双面手套; 手套; 手套; 按压泵; 滚珠瓶; 抹刀; 海绵; 喷雾瓶; 其他
pt-PT: Formato do aplicador: Aplicador com alça para costas; Frasco com esfera rolante; Pincel; Luva de dupla face; Luva; Luva; Dispensador com bomba; Frasco roll-on; Espátula; Esponja; Garrafa pulverizadora; Outro
fi: Levittimen muoto: Selkäremmilevittäjä; Pullo rullapallolla; Sivellin; Kaksipuolinen hanska; Käsine; Hanska; Pumppuannostelija; Roll-on-pullo; Lasta; Sieni; Suihkepullo; Muu
hu: Applikátor formátuma: Hátpántos applikátor; Görgős golyós palack; Ecset; Kétoldalas kesztyű; Kesztyű; Kesztyű; Pumpás adagoló; Golyós palack; Spatula; Szivacs; Szórófejes flakon; Egyéb
bg-BG: Форма на апликатора: Апликатор с каишка за гърба; Бутилка с ролка; Четка; Двустранна ръкавица; Ръкавица; Ръкавица; Помпа дозатор; Ролкова бутилка; Шпатула; Гъба; Бутилка с пулверизатор; Други
pl: Format aplikatora: Aplikator z paskiem na plecy; Butelka z kulką; Pędzel; Dwustronna rękawica; Rękawiczka; Rękawica; Dozownik pompkowy; Butelka roll-on; Szpatułka; Gąbka; Butelka ze spryskiwaczem; Inne
nb: Påførerformat: Ryggremapplikator; Flaske med rulleball; Børste; Dobbeltsidig hanske; Hanske; Hanske; Pumpedispenser; Roll-on-flaske; Spatel; Svamp; Sprayflaske; Annet
ko: 어플리케이터 형식: 백 스트랩 어플리케이터; 롤러볼 보틀; 브러시; 양면 미트; 글러브; 미트; 펌프 디스펜서; 롤온 보틀; 스파츌라; 스펀지; 스프레이 병; 기타
ja: アプリケーター形式: バックストラップアプリケーター; ローラーボール付きボトル; ブラシ; 両面ミット; グローブ; ミット; ポンプディスペンサー; ロールオンボトル; スパチュラ; スポンジ; スプレーボトル; その他
tr: Aplikatör formatı: Sırt kayışlı aplikatör; Bilyeli şişe; Fırça; Çift taraflı eldiven; Eldiven; Eldiven; Pompalı dağıtıcı; Roll-on şişe; Spatula; Sünger; Sprey şişesi; Diğer
es: Formato del aplicador: Aplicador con correa para espalda; Botella con bola rodante; Pincel; Manopla doble cara; Guante; Manopla; Dispensador con bomba; Botella roll-on; Espátula; Esponja; Botella rociadora; Otros
ro-RO: Forma aplicatorului: Aplicator cu curea pentru spate; Sticlă cu bilă rulantă; Perie; Mănușă cu două fețe; Mănușă; Mănușă; Dozator cu pompă; Sticlă roll-on; Spatulă; Burete; Flacon pulverizator; Altele
fr: Format d’applicateur: Applicateur à sangle dorsale; Flacon à bille; Brosse; Gant double face; Gant; Gant; Distributeur à pompe; Flacon roll-on; Spatule; Éponge; Bouteille de pulvérisation; Autre
th: รูปแบบอุปกรณ์ทา: ที่ทาหลังแบบสาย; ขวดลูกกลิ้ง; แปรง; ถุงมือสองด้าน; ถุงมือ; ถุงมือ; หัวปั๊ม; ขวดแบบลูกกลิ้ง; ไม้พาย; ฟองน้ำ; ขวดสเปรย์; อื่นๆ
el: Μορφή απλικατέρ: Εφαρμοστής με ιμάντα πλάτης; Φιάλη με περιστρεφόμενη μπάλα; Βούρτσα; Γάντι διπλής όψης; Γάντι; Γάντι; Αντλία διανομής; Φιάλη ρολ-ον; Σπάτουλα; Σφουγγάρι; Μπουκάλι σπρέι; Άλλο
de: Format des Applikators: Rückenband-Applikator; Flasche mit Rollerball; Bürste; Doppelseitiger Handschuh; Handschuh; Handschuh; Pumpspender; Roll-on-Flasche; Spachtel; Schwamm; Sprühflasche; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 塗抹器形式: 背部帶式塗抹器; 滾珠瓶; 畫筆; 雙面手套; 手套; 手套; 按壓式分配器; 滾球瓶; 刮刀; 海綿; 噴霧瓶; 其他
da: Applikatorformat: Rygstrop-applikator; Flaske med rullekugle; Børste; Dobbeltsidet handske; Handske; Vante; Pumpedispenser; Roll-on flaske; Spatel; Svamp; Sprayflaske; Andet
cs: Formát aplikátoru: Aplikátor s popruhem na záda; Láhev s kuličkou; Štětec; Oboustranná rukavice; Rukavice; Rukavice; Pumpička; Roll-on láhev; Špachtle; Houba; Láhev s rozprašovačem; Jiné
sl-SI: Format aplikatorja: Aplikator s trakom za hrbet; Steklenička z rolo kroglo; Krtačna; Dvostranska rokavička; Rokavica; Rokavička; Dozirnik s pumpico; Roll-on steklenička; Spatula; Goba; Steklenička z razpršilom; Drugo
en: Applicator format: Back strap applicator; Bottle with roller ball; Brush; Double-sided mitt; Glove; Mitt; Pump dispenser; Roll-on bottle; Spatula; Sponge; Spray bottle; Other
it: Formato dell'applicatore: Applicatore con cinghia dorsale; Flacone con sfera rotante; Pennello; Guanto a doppia faccia; Guanto; Guanto; Dispenser a pompa; Flacone roll-on; Spatola; Spugna; Bottiglia spray; Altro
sv: Applikatorformat: Ryggremsapplikator; Flaska med rullkula; Borste; Dubbelsidig vante; Handske; Vante; Pumpdispenser; Roll-on-flaska; Spatel; Svamp; Sprejflaska; Övrigt
hr-HR: Format aplikatora: Aplikator s remenom za leđa; Bočica s kuglom za kotrljanje; Četkica; Dvostrana rukavica; Rukavica; Rukavica; Pumpica dozator; Roll-on bočica; Lopatica; Spužva; Boca s raspršivačem; Ostalo
lt-LT: Aplikatoriaus formatas: Nugaros dirželio aplikatorius; Buteliukas su rutuliniu aplikatoriumi; Šepetėlis; Dvipusė pirštinė; Pirštinė; Pirštinė; Pompinis dozatorius; Rutulinis buteliukas; Mentelė; Pintis; Buteliukas su purkštuku; Kita
vi: Định dạng dụng cụ bôi: Dụng cụ thoa dây đeo lưng; Chai có bi lăn; Cọ; Găng hai mặt; Găng tay; Găng; Vòi bơm; Chai lăn; Thìa vét bột; Miếng bọt; Bình xịt; Khác
pt-BR: Formato do aplicador: Aplicador com alça para costas; Frasco com esfera rolante; Pincel; Luva dupla face; Luva; Luva aplicadora; Dispensador com bomba; Frasco roll-on; Espátula; Esponja; Garrafas de spray; Outro